California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
(b) Any action by the commissioner or the director pursuant to subdivision (a) may be appealed in a manner consistent with the procedures for appealing the suspension of a restricted material permit as prescribed in Section 11512.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 705, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1996.   Section operative January 1, 1997, pursuant to Section 14099.5.)
-------------------------------------------

14099.5.

This chapter shall become operative on January 1, 1997.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 705, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1996.   Note: This section prescribes a delayed operative date for Chapter 3.4, commencing with Section 14090.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3.5. Environmentally Harmful Material [14101. - 14103.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [14101. - 14101.]

14101.

As used in this division, “environment” means the aggregate of all factors that influence the conditions of life in or about the state or within any portion thereof, and which are affected by the use of pesticides or related materials within the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 361, Sec. 97.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. General Provisions [14102. - 14103.]

14102.

The director shall prohibit or regulate the use of environmentally harmful materials, pursuant to the provisions of Chapters 2 (commencing with Section 12751) and 3 (commencing with Section 14001) of this division. In so doing, he shall consider the effect of all such materials upon the environment, and shall take whatever steps he deems necessary to protect the environment. He shall also continue to initiate, cooperate, and collaborate with the University of California and with other state agencies in research designed to reduce and eliminate the use of environmentally harmful materials.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1169.)
-------------------------------------------

14103.

In establishing criteria and regulations relating to environmental injury and protection, and in conducting the reviews required in Chapters 2 and 3, the director shall consult with representatives of the Water Resources Control Board, the Departments of Public Health, Fish and Game and Conservation, and four outside experts of his selection from the fields of agricultural, biological, ecological, and medical sciences.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1169.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3.6. Qualified Applicator Certificates [14151. - 14155.]

14151.

The director may, by regulation, specify the pesticide applications that shall be made by or under the supervision of a person holding a valid qualified applicator certificate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 503, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

14152.

An application for a qualified applicator certificate shall be in the form prescribed by the director. Each application shall state the name and address of the applicant specified on the application and any other information required by the director. The application shall be accompanied by a fee as prescribed by the director pursuant to Section 11502.5. All certificates issued under this chapter shall expire on December 31 of the last year for which they are issued. Certificates may be renewed
 before their expiration through application in the form prescribed by the director and upon payment of a fee as prescribed by the director pursuant to Section 11502.5. A penalty shall be assessed against any applicant who applies for renewal after the expiration date as prescribed by the director pursuant to Section 11502.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 60, Sec. 19.   (AB 203)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

14153.

Applicants shall be examined on the requirements of laws and regulations concerning pesticide use and shall elect to be examined for certification in one or more of the categories established by the director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 60, Sec. 20.   (AB 203)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

14153.1.

The director may designate subcategories within the categories established pursuant to Section 14153, as determined to be necessary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 60, Sec. 21.   (AB 203)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

14154.

The director shall issue a qualified applicator certificate to each applicant who satisfies the requirements of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 503, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

14155.

A qualified applicator certificate may be refused, revoked, or suspended by the director, after hearing, for any of the following:

(a) Failure to comply with any applicable provision of this division or Division 6 (commencing with Section 11401) or any regulation adopted pursuant to these divisions.

(b) Failure to supervise pesticide applications in a manner that ensures compliance with this division and Division 6 (commencing with Section 11401) or any regulation adopted pursuant to these divisions.

(c) Making any false or fraudulent record or report.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 624, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3.7. Carbon Monoxide Pest Control Devices [14160. - 14161.]

14160.

For purposes of this chapter, “carbon monoxide pest control device” means any method or instrument using carbon monoxide to prevent, eliminate, destroy, or mitigate burrowing rodent pests.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 257, Sec. 2.   (SB 1332)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

14161.

The director shall regulate the use of carbon monoxide pest control devices, and shall adopt and enforce regulations to provide for the proper, safe, and efficient use of these devices for the protection of public health and safety, and the environment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 257, Sec. 2.   (SB 1332)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Livestock Drugs [14200. - 14390.]



  ARTICLE 1. Legislative Intent [14200. - 14200.]

14200.

The Legislature hereby declares that this chapter, which prescribes the distribution and use of livestock drugs, is intended to assure that such drugs are available to livestock producers for their use in protecting the health of the livestock population of the state, and that such use will in turn benefit the general public by providing an abundant supply of wholesome food and fiber.

It is further declared that nothing in this chapter is intended to prevent a livestock producer from administering livestock drugs safely and effectively when such use is in accordance with the labeling directions for the drug used.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1224.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.5. Definitions [14201. - 14209.]

14201.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

14202.

“Drug” means any of the following substances:

(a) Any substance which is intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, prevention, or treatment of disease.

(b) Any substance, except food and water, which is intended to affect the structure or function of the body of any livestock.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

14203.

“Restricted drug” means any livestock drug which is sold in such form that it might be administered to humans and if so administered would be dangerous to the health of such humans or any livestock drug which if improperly administered to livestock is dangerous to the health of such livestock or to humans who consume products from such livestock. Restricted drugs include all of the following:

(a) Arsenic compounds and preparations.

(b) Diethylstilbestrol and other substances which have a hormonelike action. 

(c) Sulfanilamide or substitute sulfanilamides.

(d) Antibiotic preparations.

(e) Such other drugs and their preparations which the director determines are hazardous to the health of livestock or the public safety.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1224.)
-------------------------------------------

14204.

“Label” includes written and graphic matter which is imprinted upon, or upon paper or other material affixed to, or accompanying, a container of a livestock drug.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1224.)
-------------------------------------------

14205.

“Livestock” includes all animals, poultry, and bees, and aquatic and amphibian species which are raised, kept, or used for profit. It does not include those species which are usually kept as pets, such as dogs, cats, and pet birds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1224.)
-------------------------------------------

14206.

“Livestock drug” means any drug, combination of drugs, proprietary medicine, or combination of drugs and other ingredients which is prepared for administration to livestock orally, hypodermically, topically, or otherwise.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1224.)
-------------------------------------------

14207.

“Manufacturer” includes any person that is responsible for the placing of a livestock drug on the market in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1224.)
-------------------------------------------

14208.

“Retailer” means any person that sells any livestock drug at retail.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1224.)
-------------------------------------------

14209.

“Distribute” means to offer for sale, sell, exchange, or barter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1224.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. General Provisions [14231. - 14233.]

14231.

The director shall enforce this chapter and, in accordance with the provisions of Section 14200, may make and enforce such regulations which relate to the manufacture, sale, and use of livestock drugs as he may deem necessary to carry out this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1224.)
-------------------------------------------

14232.

All money which is received under this chapter shall be paid into the Department of Agriculture Fund. Any money in the Department of Agriculture Fund which is derived under this chapter and Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14901) of this division may be expended for the administration and enforcement of any of the provisions of such chapters, notwithstanding any other provision which limits the expenditure of any such money to the specific purposes or to the administration or enforcement of each of such chapters separately.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

14233.

The provisions of this chapter shall be controlling over those of any other provisions of law which are in conflict with them. No act or thing which is authorized or permitted by this chapter shall be in violation of any other provisions of law.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Exemptions [14261. - 14262.]

14261.

This chapter, except Section 14363, does not apply to any of the following:

(a) Any livestock drug which is sold exclusively to, and used exclusively by, or under the direction of, a licensed veterinarian, nor to any livestock drug which is compounded by a registered pharmacist upon the prescription of a licensed veterinarian.

(b) Any drug or other preparation which is dispensed or compounded by a registered pharmacist at the request of the purchaser if such drug or preparation is sold at retail.

(c) Any commercial feed which is subject to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14901) of this division, irrespective of the presence in such commercial feed of any ingredients which otherwise would constitute a livestock drug.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 164, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

14262.

This chapter also does not apply to any of the following:

(a) Any livestock drug that is intended for, and that is used solely for, laboratory or experimental purposes.

(b) Any substance that is intended for, and that is used primarily as a pesticide and that is registered as a pesticide under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 12751).

(c) Any biological product that is manufactured under a license issued by the United States Department of Agriculture or the State Department of Health.

(d) Any drug that is required by federal law to be sold on prescription only.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 361, Sec. 98.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Registration [14281. - 14296.]

14281.

A person shall not sell any livestock drug in this state prior to receipt of a registration certificate pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 834, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

14282.

The manufacturer of any livestock drug shall apply to the director for registration of the livestock drug.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1224.)
-------------------------------------------

14283.

The application shall be in a form which is supplied by the director. It shall show all of the following:

(a) The name of the applicant and the address of his principal place of business.

(b) The name, brand, or trademark under which the livestock drug is to be sold.

(c) The minimum net contents of each size and type of container in which the livestock drug is to be sold at retail.

(d) The name of each active drug ingredient and the quantity or proportion of each such ingredient.

(e) A statement of each purpose for which the livestock drug is to be used.

(f) A statement of the form in which the livestock drug is to be administered, the method of administration, and, if the method of administration involves the use of any special device which is supplied with such drug, a description of such device.

(g) A statement of the amount and frequency of the dosage which is to be recommended.

(h) Such other information and data as the director may require.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1224.)
-------------------------------------------

14284.

The application shall also contain a detailed description, or be accompanied by a copy, of the label of each type and size of container in which the livestock drug is be sold at retail.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1224.)
-------------------------------------------

14285.

The label shall contain all of the following:

(a) The name, brand, or trademark of the livestock drug.

(b) The name of the applicant and his principal address.

(c) The minimum net contents of the container.

(d) A statement of the disease or ailments of livestock which it is claimed that the livestock drug will alleviate or cure.

(e) Adequate instructions as to use and administration and adequate warnings against improper use and administration of the livestock drug, including adequate withdrawal periods and product disposal times to prevent any dangerous drug residues in products produced by livestock for human consumption.

(f) The name and amount of each active drug ingredient.

(g) A statement which clearly indicates that the product is not for human use. 

(h) If the livestock drug is a restricted drug, the words “restricted drug, use only as directed” in conspicuous letters.

(i) Such other information as the director may require to ensure proper use to safeguard the health of animals and humans who consume products from such animals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1224.)
-------------------------------------------

14286.

If it is proposed that any instructions for use, other than those on the label, shall accompany containers of the livestock drug which are sold at retail, a copy of such instructions shall accompany the application for registration of the livestock drug.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1224.)
-------------------------------------------

14287.

The director shall examine and consider the application together with all material, data, and information which accompanies it.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

14288.

The director shall refuse to register a livestock drug if he finds any of the following is true of the drug:

(a) It is of little or no value for the purpose for which it is intended to be used.

(b) It is dangerous to the health of livestock if used in accordance with the instructions.

(c) The instructions for use do not contain adequate warnings against use in those conditions, whether pathological or normal, under which its use may be dangerous to the health of livestock or humans who consume products from such livestock, or against unsafe dosage, unsafe duration of use, or unsafe methods of administration.

(d) If the application and the accompanying material, data, and information do not comply with the requirements of this chapter or are insufficient to permit the director to make the determinations which are required by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1224.)
-------------------------------------------

14289.

If the livestock drug is a restricted drug, the director shall also refuse registration if he finds that the instructions for use do not contain adequate and satisfactory directions as to the methods of handling, caring for, holding, or otherwise managing the livestock to which the drug is administered so as to eliminate any danger to the health of any person who might consume food products which are derived from such livestock.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1224.)
-------------------------------------------

14290.

The registration of a livestock drug includes all of the following:

(a) Registration of the drug and its ingredients.

(b) Registration of the label.

(c) Registration of the instructions for use.

(d) Registration of the special device, if any, for the administration of the livestock drug.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1224.)
-------------------------------------------

14291.

(a) The fee for a two-year registration certificate for a livestock drug is one hundred eighty dollars ($180). The certificate period shall commence beginning January 1 of each even-numbered year and expire on December 31 of the next odd-numbered year.

(b) The fee for a registration certificate submitted during an odd-numbered year shall be ninety dollars ($90), and the certificate shall remain in effect until December 31 of that year.

(c) The fee shall accompany the application for registration. The fee is not refundable if the registration is refused.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 834, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14292.

If registration is granted, the original fee covers the registration for the remainder of the then current calendar year in which registration is granted.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

14293.

The fee for application for renewal of registration is one hundred eighty dollars ($180) for a two-year period. It is payable on or before January 31st of each year. If it is not so paid, a penalty of fifty dollars ($50) shall be added to the fee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 834, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

14294.

The director may quarantine and remove from sale any livestock drug which is not registered pursuant to this chapter or any livestock drug which does not conform in all respects with its registration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1224.)
-------------------------------------------

14295.

The director shall have access at all reasonable hours to all premises which are used in the manufacture, sale, or storage of any livestock drug, or where livestock drugs are mixed in feed for administering to livestock. He may take samples and make such other investigations as are necessary to carry out this chapter and the regulations which are adopted pursuant to it.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1224.)
-------------------------------------------

14296.

The director may revoke the registration of any livestock drug if he finds, from representative samples, that the drug as offered for sale fails to conform to its registration. The director may allow reasonable tolerances within which such samples may vary from the registration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1224.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Retail Licenses for Restricted Drugs [14321. - 14330.]

14321.

A person shall not sell any restricted drug in this state at retail unless he holds a license to do so issued pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1224.)
-------------------------------------------

14322.

Any person may file with the director an application for a license pursuant to this chapter. The application shall be on a form which is supplied by the director and shall contain such information as he may require.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

14323.

The application shall be accompanied by an application fee of fifty dollars ($50). The fee is not refundable if the license is refused.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 622, Sec. 1.   (AB 1132)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

14324.

If the license is issued, the application fee covers the license for the remainder of the current calendar year in which it is issued.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

14325.

The fee for the renewal application for a license is fifty dollars ($50) per year, payable on or before January 31 of each year. If the fee is not paid by that date, a penalty of fifty dollars ($50) shall be added to the fee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 622, Sec. 2.   (AB 1132)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

14326.

A separate license is required for each place of business at which any restricted drug is kept for sale, and for each mobile unit in which any such drug is kept for sale.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1224.)
-------------------------------------------

14327.

The director may make an examination of the facilities which are available to the applicant for the proper handling and storing of restricted drugs and may limit the kinds or classes of such drugs that may be sold under a license to those which the applicant is equipped properly to handle and store.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1224.)
-------------------------------------------

14328.

Each holder of a license under this chapter shall keep a record, in the manner and form prescribed by the director, of each sale of a restricted drug by the licensee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1224.)
-------------------------------------------

14329.

The record required pursuant to Section 14328 shall include all of the following:

(a) A statement of the kind and quantity of the restricted drug sold.

(b) The date of sale.

(c) The name and address of the purchaser.

(d) The signature of the purchaser.

(e) Any other information as the director may determine is reasonably necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1224.)
-------------------------------------------

14330.

The director shall revoke a restricted drug license if he finds that the holder of such license has failed to keep the required record of sales of such drugs, or is not properly handling or storing such drugs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1224.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Violations [14351. - 14365.]

14351.

It is unlawful for any person to sell any livestock drug which is subject to any provision of this chapter unless the drug is registered pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1224.)
-------------------------------------------

14352.

It is unlawful for any registrant to sell any livestock drug which does not conform with its registration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1224.)
-------------------------------------------

14353.

It is unlawful for any person to administer any registered livestock drug to any human being.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1224.)
-------------------------------------------

14354.

It is unlawful for any person to sell any restricted drug unless such person has a license issued pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1224.)
-------------------------------------------

14355.

It is unlawful for any person to use or administer any registered livestock drug except in accordance with the label instructions for use which are supplied by the registrant, including all warnings, withdrawal periods, and livestock product disposal times.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1224.)
-------------------------------------------

14356.

It is unlawful for the holder of a restricted drug license to sell a restricted drug without requiring the purchaser of the restricted drug to sign his name and write his address in the record of such sales.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1224.)
-------------------------------------------

14357.

It is unlawful for any person to refuse to permit the entry into and inspection of any premises wherein any livestock drug is manufactured or sold for the taking of samples of such drug.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1224.)
-------------------------------------------

14358.

It is unlawful for any person to sell any livestock drug except in the container in which it is packaged by the manufacturer or distributor or to sell any such drug unless its package bears the label of the manufacturer or distributor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1224.)
-------------------------------------------

14359.

It is unlawful for any person to make any false or misleading representation which relates to any livestock drug, whether such representation is communicated orally, graphically, pictorially, or otherwise.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1224.)
-------------------------------------------

14360.

It is unlawful for any livestock owner or his or her agent to sell or dispose of treated livestock or livestock products within the specified withdrawal period without first notifying the buyer that the livestock or products have been treated. The notification shall be in a form prescribed by the director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 238, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

14361.

The director may seize and hold any livestock drug which he has reasonable cause to believe is in violation of the provisions of this chapter or the regulations adopted pursuant to it. The director shall continue to hold the livestock drug until such time as the requirements of this chapter have been complied with, at which time the lot shall be released. If the requirements of this chapter cannot be complied with, the director shall issue an order for disposal of the livestock drug, in a manner determined by him to protect the public health and safety and accomplish purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1224.)
-------------------------------------------

14362.

It is unlawful for any person to manufacture, distribute, sell, or use any livestock drug without complying with the provisions of this chapter and the regulations which are adopted pursuant to it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1224.)
-------------------------------------------

14363.

(a) It is unlawful for any livestock owner or agent to sell or dispose of any livestock or livestock carcasses which within 48 hours after the buyer takes possession have drug residues in excess of allowable federal or state tolerances. In addition to any other penalties imposed by this chapter, any livestock owner or agent violating this section shall be liable to the buyer for an amount equal to three times the purchase price of any livestock or livestock carcasses with drug residues in excess of allowable federal or state tolerances so long as the liability does not conflict with the federal Packers and Stockyards Act, and shall be liable for a civil penalty of not more than one hundred dollars ($100) for each head of livestock or livestock carcass disposed of or sold. In addition, the livestock owner or agent shall be liable for any attorney’s fees.

(b) In addition to the penalties imposed by this chapter, the sale or disposition of any livestock or livestock carcass which, within 48 hours after the buyer takes possession, has drug residue in excess of allowable federal or state tolerances, is punishable by an administrative fine, levied by the director, in the amount of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) per head for a second or subsequent violation within a 12-month period.

(c) In lieu of assessing the administrative fine, the director may authorize a violator to attend an educational program on livestock drug residue avoidance which has been approved by the director. The violator shall successfully complete the program and provide proof to the director within 90 days from the occurrence of the violation.

(d) This section does not affect any rights or obligations under any contract between a livestock owner or agent, buyer, or any other party.

(e) Any additional funds collected as administrative fines pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the General Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 164, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

14364.

(a) It is unlawful to sell or dispose of a bob veal calf for the purposes of slaughter without first affixing to the animal a producer identification number approved by the director.

(b) For purposes of this chapter, “bob veal calf” means a bovine animal 21 days of age or less or weighing 150 pounds or less, or as specified in Food Safety Inspection Service regulations of the United States Department of Agriculture.

(c) Bob veal calves that are identified as provided in Division 10 (commencing with Section 20001) are exempt from this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 164, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

14365.

(a) It is unlawful to sell or dispose of a dairy cull cow without first affixing to the animal a producer identification number issued by the director.

(b) For purposes of this chapter, “cull cow” means a female bovine animal 21 days of age or more, which is sold or disposed of for the purpose of slaughter.

(c) Cull cows that are identified as provided in Division 10 (commencing with Section 20001) are exempt from this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 164, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Penalties [14381. - 14382.]

14381.

A violation of this chapter or of any regulation which is adopted by the director pursuant to this chapter is an infraction punishable by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500) for the first violation. A second or subsequent violation of this chapter is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) and not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 238, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14382.

(a) The director may, after a hearing, refuse to issue or renew, or may suspend or revoke a livestock drug registration or restricted drug license for any violation of this chapter or any regulation which is adopted pursuant thereto.

(b) Upon calling a hearing, the director shall serve notice personally or by mail to the licensee or registrant specifying the time and place of the hearing at least 10 days prior to the hearing. At the hearing, the director may do all of the following:

(1) Administer oaths and hear testimony.

(2) Issue subpoenas requiring the attendance of the licensee, registrant, or witnesses, together with books, records, memoranda, papers, and all other documents that may be pertinent to the case.

(3) Compel the disclosure of the licensee or registrant and any witness of all the facts known to him or her regarding the case. In no instance shall any employee of the Feed, Fertilizer, and Livestock Drugs Branch serve as the hearing officer in any case under this section.

(c) Any person deprived of a license or registration has the right to appeal this action to the director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 238, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Procedure for Prosecution [14390. - 14390.]

14390.

In addition to the remedies provided in this chapter, the department may bring an action in superior court and such court shall have jurisdiction upon hearing and for cause shown, to grant a temporary or permanent injunction restraining any person from violating any provision of this chapter or the rules and regulations adopted under this chapter. Any proceeding under the provisions of this section shall conform to the requirements of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525) of Title 7 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure. The department shall not, however, be required to allege facts necessary to show or tending to show irreparable damage or loss. The court may require such acts or course of conduct as necessary to effectuate the purpose of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1224.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4.5. Livestock: Use of Antimicrobial Drugs [14400. - 14408.]

14400.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Medically important antimicrobial drug” means an antimicrobial drug listed in Appendix A of the federal Food and Drug Administration’s Guidance for Industry #152, including critically important, highly important, and important antimicrobial drugs, as that appendix may be amended.

(b) “Livestock” means all animals and poultry, including aquatic and amphibian species, that are raised, kept, or used for profit. Livestock does not include bees or those species that are usually kept as pets, such as dogs, cats, and pet birds.

(c) “Veterinary feed directive” has the same definition as in Section 558.3 of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 758, Sec. 1.   (SB 27)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

14401.

A medically important antimicrobial drug shall not be administered to livestock unless it is ordered by a licensed veterinarian through a prescription or veterinary feed directive that complies with federal and state law, including, but not limited to, Part 514 (commencing with Section 514.1), Part 530 (commencing with Section 530.1), and Part 558 (commencing with Section 558.3) of Subchapter E of Chapter I of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations and Section 4826.6 of the Business and Professions Code. A prescription for labeled use of a medically important antimicrobial drug shall be issued pursuant to a veterinarian-client-patient relationship that meets the requirements of Section 4826.6 of the Business and Professions Code. Veterinary feed directives and prescriptions for extralabel use of a medically important antimicrobial drug shall be
 issued pursuant to a veterinarian-client-patient relationship that meets the requirements of Section 530.3 of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 198, Sec. 2.   (AB 1505)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

14402.

(a) Beginning January 1, 2018, a medically important antimicrobial drug may be used when, in the professional judgment of a licensed veterinarian, the medically important antimicrobial drug is any of the following:

(1) Necessary to treat a disease or infection.

(2) Necessary to control the spread of a disease or infection. 

(3) Necessary in relation to surgery or a medical procedure.

(b) A medically important antimicrobial drug may also be used when, in the professional judgment of a licensed veterinarian, it
 is needed for prophylaxis to address an elevated risk of contraction of a particular disease or infection. 

(c) A person shall not administer a medically important antimicrobial drug to livestock solely for purposes of promoting weight gain or improving feed efficiency.

(d) Unless the administration is consistent with subdivision (a), a person shall not administer a medically important antimicrobial drug in a regular pattern.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 758, Sec. 1.   (SB 27)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

14403.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 14401 and 14402 of this code and Article 15 (commencing with Section 4196) of Chapter 9 of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code, medically important antimicrobial drugs may be sold by retailers licensed pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 14321) of Chapter 4 of Division 7 with a prescription or veterinary feed directive from a licensed veterinarian.

(b) This section shall not be construed to invalidate the requirement to obtain a prescription or veterinary feed directive to administer a medically important antimicrobial drug as required by Section 14401. 

(c) The department may promulgate
 regulations to implement this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 758, Sec. 1.   (SB 27)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

14404.

(a) The department, in consultation with the Veterinary Medical Board, the State Department of Public Health, universities, and cooperative extensions, shall develop antimicrobial stewardship guidelines and best management practices for veterinarians, as well as livestock owners and their employees who are involved with administering medically important antimicrobial drugs, on the proper use of medically important antimicrobial drugs for disease treatment, control, and prevention. The guidelines shall include scientifically validated practical alternatives to the use of medically important antimicrobial drugs, including, but not limited to, the introduction of effective vaccines and good hygiene and management practices.

(b) The department shall consult with livestock producers, licensed veterinarians, and any other relevant stakeholders on ensuring livestock timely access to treatment for producers in rural areas with limited access to veterinary care. 

(c) For purposes of this section, “antimicrobial stewardship” is a commitment to do all of the following:

(1) To use medically important antimicrobial drugs only when necessary to treat, control, and, in some cases, prevent, disease.

(2) To select the appropriate medically important antimicrobial drug and the appropriate dose, duration, and route of administration.

(3) To use medically important antimicrobial drugs for the shortest duration necessary and to
 administer them to the fewest animals necessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 758, Sec. 1.   (SB 27)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

14405.
